Utah statutes.
41-4-5.   Unlawful for person financing sales to accept gratuity.
It shall be unlawful for any person who is engaged in the business of
financing the purchase or sale of motor vehicles or of buying conditional
sales contracts, chattel mortgages or leases on motor vehicles sold at retail
within this state to accept or receive, or contract or agree to accept or
receive, either directly or indirectly, any payment, thing, or service of
value from any person who is engaged, either directly or indirectly, in the
manufacture or wholesale distribution only of motor vehicles, whether patented
or unpatented, if the effect of the acceptance or receipt of any such payment,
thing, or service of value may be to lessen or eliminate competition, or to
create or tend to create a monopoly in the person who accepts or receives such
payment, thing, or service of value, or contracts or agrees to accept or
receive the same.
